tr: Boncuk işleme deseni şema formatı: Boncuk boncuk diyagram; Renk kodlu şema; Grafik şeması (ızgara); Desen + şema (birleşik); Adım adım fotoğraflar; Adım adım yazılı talimatlar; Sembol şeması/lejant; Video eğitim; Diğer
zh-TW: 串珠圖案表格式: 逐珠圖解; 顏色編碼圖表; 方格圖表 (網格); 圖案 + 圖表 (組合); 步驟照片; 步驟文字說明; 符號圖表/圖例; 影片教學課程; 其他
pt-BR: Formato do gráfico de padrões de bordado com miçangas: Diagrama miçanga por miçanga; Gráfico com código de cores; Gráfico quadriculado (grade); Padrão + gráfico (combinado); Fotos passo a passo; Instruções escritas passo a passo; Gráfico de símbolos/legenda; Tutorial em vídeo; Outro
de: Format des Perlenmusterdiagramms: Perle-für-Perle-Diagramm; Farbcodiertes Diagramm; Gitterdiagramm (Raster); Muster + Diagramm (kombiniert); Schritt-für-Schritt-Fotos; Schritt-für-Schritt-Anleitung in Textform; Symboldiagramm/Legende; Video-Tutorial; Sonstige
da: Format for diagram over perlemønster: Diagram perle for perle; Farvekodet diagram; Grafisk diagram (gitter); Mønster og diagram (kombineret); Trin for trin-billeder; Skriftlig trin for trin-vejledning; Symboldiagram/-forklaring; Videovejledning; Andet
nl: Rijgpatroon diagramformaat: Kraal-voor-kraal diagram; Kleurgecodeerd diagram; Grafiek (raster); Patroon en diagram (gecombineerd); Stapsgewijze foto's; Stapsgewijze geschreven instructies; Symboolschema/legenda; Videotutorial; Overig
sv: Format för pärlmönsterdiagram: Diagram pärla för pärla; Färgkodat diagram; Grafiskt diagram (rutnät); Mönster och diagram (kombinerat); Steg-för-steg-bilder; Skriftliga steg-för-steg-instruktioner; Symboldiagram/teckenförklaring; Videohandledning; Övrigt
sl-SI: Oblika diagrama vzorcev perlic: Diagram perla za perlo; Barvna shema; Grafična shema (mreža); Vzorec in shema (kombinirano); Fotografije po korakih; Pisna navodila po korakih; Shema s simboli/legenda; Videovadnica; Drugo
ja: ビーズ編みパターンチャート形式: ビーズ配置図; 色分けされたチャート; グラフチャート (グリッド); パターン + チャート (組み合わせ); 手順ごとの写真; 手順ごとの文字による説明; 記号チャート/凡例; ビデオチュートリアル; その他
it: Formato dello schema per la lavorazione delle perline: Diagramma perlina per perlina; Schema a colori; Schema grafico (griglia); Motivo + schema (combinati); Foto passo-passo; Istruzioni scritte passo-passo; Schema/legenda dei simboli; Video tutorial; Altro
th: รูปแบบแผนผังลวดลายงานลูกปัด: แผนภาพแสดงทีละลูก; แผนภูมิรหัสสี; แผนภูมิกริด; แพทเทิร์น + แผนภูมิ (รวม); รูปภาพประกอบทีละขั้นตอน; คำอธิบายเป็นลายลักษณ์อักษรทีละขั้นตอน; แผนภูมิสัญลักษณ์/คำอธิบายสัญลักษณ์; วิดีโอบทแนะนำการใช้งาน; อื่นๆ
el: Μορφή διαγράμματος μοτίβου για χάντρες: Διάγραμμα χάντρα-χάντρα; Διάγραμμα με χρωματική κωδικοποίηση; Γράφημα (πλέγμα); Μοτίβο + διάγραμμα (συνδυασμός); Φωτογραφίες βήμα προς βήμα; Γραπτές οδηγίες βήμα προς βήμα; Διάγραμμα συμβόλων/υπόμνημα; Οδηγός εκμάθησης σε βίντεο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Format tablice uzoraka za nizanje perli: Dijagram perla po perla; Tablica u boji; Grafička tablica (mreža); Uzorak + tablica (kombinirano); Fotografije korak po korak; Pisane upute korak po korak; Tablica simbola / legenda; Video obuka; Ostalo
vi: Định dạng biểu đồ mẫu đính hạt: Sơ đồ xỏ từng hạt; Sơ đồ được mã hóa màu; Sơ đồ đồ thị (lưới); Kết hợp họa tiết + sơ đồ; Ảnh hướng dẫn từng bước; Hướng dẫn bằng văn bản từng bước; Sơ đồ ký hiệu/chú giải; Hướng dẫn qua video; Khác
pt-PT: Formato de gráfico de padrões de missangas: Diagrama conta a conta; Gráfico codificado por cores; Gráfico desenhado (grelha); Padrão + gráfico (combinado); Fotografias passo a passo; Instruções escritas passo a passo; Gráfico de símbolos/legenda; Tutorial em vídeo; Outro
ko: 비즈 패턴 차트 형식: 비즈별 다이어그램; 색상 코드 차트; 그래프 차트(그리드); 패턴 + 차트(혼합형); 단계별 사진; 단계별 설명서; 기호 차트/범례; 비디오 튜토리얼; 기타
ro-RO: Formatul diagramei de modele de mărgele: Diagramă mărgea cu mărgea; Diagramă codificată pe culori; Diagramă grafică (grilă); Tipar + diagramă (combinate); Fotografii pas cu pas; Instrucțiuni scrise pas cu pas; Diagramă cu simboluri/legendă; Tutorial video; Altele
en: Beading pattern chart format: Bead-by-bead diagram; Color-coded chart; Graphed chart (grid); Pattern + chart (combined); Step-by-step photos; Step-by-step written instructions; Symbol chart/legend; Video tutorial; Other
fr: Format du diagramme de perlage: Diagramme perle par perle; Diagramme à code couleur; Diagramme quadrillé (grille); Modèle + diagramme (combinés); Photos étape par étape; Instructions écrites étape par étape; Tableau de symboles/légende; Tutoriel vidéo; Autre
sk-SK: Formát tabuľky korálkových vzorov: Diagram korálku po korálke; Farebne kódovaný graf; Grafický nákres (mriežka); Vzor a nákres (kombinované); Fotografie krok za krokom; Písomné pokyny krok za krokom; Nákres so symbolmi/legenda; Video tutoriál; Iné
bg-BG: Формат на схемата за изработка с мъниста.: Диаграма мънисто по мънисто; Цветово кодирана схема; Графична схема (мрежа); Модел и схема (комбинирани); Снимки стъпка по стъпка; Писмени инструкции стъпка по стъпка; Схема със символи/легенда; Видео обучение; Друго
ru: Формат схемы узора для бисероплетения: Схема по бисеринам; Схема с цветовой кодировкой; Графическая схема (сетка); Узор + схема (комбинированные); Пошаговые фото; Пошаговые текстовые инструкции; Символьная схема/легенда; Обучающее видео; Другое
cs: Formát schématu korálkového vzoru: Diagram korálek po korálku; Barevně odlišené schéma; Grafické schéma (mřížka); Vzor + schéma (kombinované); Fotografie krok za krokem; Písemné pokyny krok za krokem; Schéma symbolů / legenda; Video tutoriál; Jiné
hu: Gyöngyminta diagram formátuma: Szemenkénti ábra; Színkódolt minta; Grafikus minta (rács); Minta + ábra (kombinált); Lépésről lépésre fotók; Lépésről lépésre írott útmutató; Szimbólumos ábra/jelmagyarázat; Videós útmutató; Egyéb
es: Formato de diagrama de patrones de cuentas: Diagrama cuenta por cuenta; Gráfico codificado por colores; Gráfico cuadriculado (cuadrícula); Patrón y gráfico (combinados); Fotos paso a paso; Instrucciones escritas paso a paso; Gráfico de símbolos/leyenda; Tutorial en video; Otro
pl: Format schematu koralikowego: Diagram koralik po koraliku; Schemat z kodowaniem kolorami; Wykres na siatce; Wzór i schemat (połączone); Zdjęcia krok po kroku; Pisemne instrukcje krok po kroku; Schemat symboli/legenda; Tutorial wideo; Inne
lt-LT: Karoliukų vėrimo rašto schemos formatas: Karoliukas po karoliuko diagrama; Spalvomis koduota schema; Grafinė schema (tinklelis); Raštas ir schema (kombinuota); Žingsnis po žingsnio nuotraukos; Žingsnis po žingsnio rašytinės instrukcijos; Simbolių schema / legenda; Mokomoji vaizdo medžiaga; Kita
fi: Helmikirjontakuviokaavion muoto: Helmi helmeltä -kaavio; Värikoodattu kaavio; Ruudukkokaavio; Malli ja kaavio (yhdistetty); Vaiheittaiset kuvat; Vaiheittaiset kirjalliset ohjeet; Symbolikaavio/selite; Videotutoriaali; Muu
nb: Format for diagram for perlemønster: Perle-for-perle-diagram; Fargekodet diagram; Rutete diagram (rutenett); Mønster + diagram (kombinert); Trinnvise bilder; Trinnvise skriftlige instruksjoner; Symboldiagram/tegnforklaring; Videoopplæring; Annet
zh-CN: 串珠图案图表格式: 逐珠图解; 颜色编码图表; 网格图表; 图案 + 图表（组合）; 分步照片; 分步书面说明; 符号图表/图例; 视频教程; 其他